Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1607.01
State Energy Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The State Energy Cash Fund is hereby created. The fund shall consist of funds received pursuant to section 57-705. The fund shall be used for the administration of subdivisions (35) through (58) of section 81-1504 and sections 81-1604 to 81-1606, for energy conservation activities, and for providing technical assistance to communities in the area of natural gas other than assistance regarding ownership of regulated utilities, except that transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the State Energy Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning July 1, 2026, any investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.

Laws 1989, LB 727, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 126;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 81;

Laws 2015, LB469, § 14;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 157;

Laws 2026, LB1048, § 27;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 206.
The Revisor of Statutes has pursuant to section 49-769 correlated LB1048, section 27, with LB1072, section 206, to reflect all amendments.Changes made by LB1048 became effective July 18, 2026. Changes made by LB1072 became operative July 1, 2026.
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.